Indiana, session 2026, SB124.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-33-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.214-2025,
SECTION 178, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. A student is bound by the
requirements of this chapter from the earlier of the date on which the
student officially enrolls in a school or, except as provided in section
8 of this chapter, the beginning of the fall school term for the school
year in which the student becomes seven (7) is five (5) years of age on
August 1 of that school year until the date on which the student:
(1) graduates;
(2) becomes eighteen (18) years of age; or
(3) becomes sixteen (16) years of age but is less than eighteen
(18) years of age and the requirements concerning an exit
interview are met enabling the student to withdraw from school
before graduation;
whichever occurs first.
SECTION 2. IC 20-33-2-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005, SECTION
17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026 IN 124—LS 6303/DI 110


2026]: Sec. 8. A student is not bound by the requirements of this
chapter until the student becomes seven (7) five (5) years of age, if,
upon request of the superintendent of the school corporation, the parent
of a student who would otherwise be subject to compulsory school
attendance under section 6 of this chapter certifies to the
superintendent that the parent intends to:
(1) enroll the student in a nonaccredited, nonpublic school; or
(2) begin providing the student with instruction equivalent to that
given in the public schools as permitted under section 28 of this
chapter;
not later than the date on which the student becomes seven (7) August
1 of the school year if the student is five (5) years of age on August
1 of the school year.
SECTION 3. IC 20-51-1-4.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 199, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.3. "Eligible choice scholarship
student" refers to an individual who:
(1) has legal settlement in Indiana; and
(2) is at least five (5) years of age and less than twenty-two (22)
years of age on October 1 August 1 of the applicable school year.
SECTION 4. IC 20-51-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.162-2024,
SECTION 27, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. "Eligible student" refers to an individual who:
(1) has legal settlement in Indiana;
(2) is at least four (4) years of age and less than twenty-two (22)
years of age on October 1 August 1 of the applicable school year;
(3) either has been or is currently enrolled in a participating
school; and
(4) is a member of a household with an annual income of not
more than four hundred percent (400%) of the amount required
for the individual to qualify for the federal free or reduced price
lunch program.
SECTION 5. IC 20-51.4-2-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 203, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. "Eligible student" refers to an
individual who:
(1) has legal settlement in Indiana;
(2) is at least five (5) years of age and less than twenty-two (22)
years of age on October 1 August 1 of the applicable school year;
and
(3) is a student:
(A) with a disability at the time the account is established who
2026 IN 124—LS 6303/DI 110


requires special education and for whom:
(i) an individualized education program;
(ii) a service plan developed under 511 IAC 7-34; or
(iii) a choice special education plan developed under 511
IAC 7-49;
has been developed; or
(B) who is a sibling of a student described in clause (A) who
has had an ESA account established in the student's name
under IC 20-51.4-4-1.
(4) meets the annual income qualification requirement for a
choice scholarship student under IC 20-51-1.
2026 IN 124—LS 6303/DI 110